Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4045.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 453, O.S.L.
2025 (44 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 301B), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 301B. A. There is hereby created in the State Treasury
a revolving fund for the Oklahoma Military Department to be
designated the "Base Infrastructure Needs and Development -
Technology Revolving Fund", which may also be cited as "BIND –
Technology Fund" "Military Readiness, Innovation, Education, and
Aviation Revolving Fund". The fund shall be a continuing fund, not
subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of all monies
directed for deposit to the fund by law. All monies accruing to the
credit of said fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and
expended by the Oklahoma Military Department for the purpose
established in subsection B of this section. Expenditures from said
fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer

against claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services for approval and
payment.
B. There is hereby established within the Oklahoma Military
Department the "Base Infrastructure Needs and Development –
Technology Program", which may also be cited as the "BIND –
Technology Program" "Military Readiness, Technology, Education, and
Innovation Program". The Department shall utilize funds from the
BIND – Technology Fund Military Readiness, Innovation, Education,
and Aviation Revolving Fund created in subsection A of this section,
alone or in combination with other available funding, to make
infrastructure, equipment, or technology investments, including, but
not limited to, the purchase of licenses and software associated
with military simulation training, improved access onto or off a
military facility, construct or improve common education facilities
located on military bases, or to grow local industries that will
either:
1. Decrease the likelihood of military base and other military
infrastructure closures in this state; or
2. Increase the likelihood of military base and other military
infrastructure expansions in this state.
C. In fiscal years where funds are expended from the Military
Readiness, Innovation, Education, and Aviation Revolving Fund, the
Oklahoma Military Department shall file a report within forty-five
(45) days after the close of the fiscal year with the Governor, the
Speaker of the Oklahoma House of Representatives, the President Pro
Tempore of the Oklahoma State Senate, the Appropriations and Budget
Chair of the Oklahoma House of Representatives, and the
Appropriations Chair of the Oklahoma State Senate, stating how the
funds were used.
SECTION 2. REPEALER Section 1, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2025
(44 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 301A), is hereby repealed.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this act shall become effective July 1,
2026.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 4045 Page 2

SECTION 5. Section 2 of this act shall become effective
November 1, 2026.
ENR. H. B. NO. 4045 Page 3

Passed the House of Representatives the 14th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 16th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 4045 Page 4